Georgia statutes. TITLE 6 Aviation
CHAPTER 2 Regulation of Aeronautics, Aircraft, and Airports Generally

Cross references.

Sale of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and wine by airline passenger carriers, §§

3-9-1

,

3-9-2

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Licensing of certain public airports, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-9.

6-2-1.
Legislative intent.

It is declared that the intent of this chapter is to coincide with the policies, principles, and practices established by the Federal Aviation Act of 1958 and all amendments thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 11; Code 1933, § 11-110.

U.S. Code.

The Federal Aviation Act of 1958, referred to in this section, is codified as

49 U.S.C. § 1301

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on commercial transportation, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 41 (2017).

6-2-2.
“Airman” defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “airman” means any individual who engages, as the person in command or as pilot, mechanic, or member of the crew, in the navigation of aircraft while underway; and any individual who is directly in charge of the inspection, maintenance, overhauling, or repair of aircraft, aircraft engines, propellers, or appliances; or any individual who serves in the capacity of aircraft dispatcher or air traffic control tower operator.

6-2-3.
Effect of contractual and other legal relations entered into aboard aircraft while in flight over state.

All contractual and other legal relations entered into by airmen or passengers while in flight over this state shall have the same effect as if entered into on the land or water beneath.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 8; Code 1933, § 11-108.

6-2-4.
Laws governing crimes committed aboard aircraft while in flight over state.

Unless otherwise provided by law, all crimes committed by or against an airman or by or against a passenger or other person or on or by means of an aircraft while in flight over this state shall be governed by the laws of this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 9; Code 1933, § 11-109.

Cross references.

Venue for criminal actions stemming from crimes committed upon aircraft traveling within state, §

17-2-2

.

6-2-5.
Lawful flight over lands and waters of state.

Flight in aircraft over the lands and waters shall be lawful unless at such a low altitude as to interfere with the then existing reasonable use to which the land or water or space over the land or water is put by the owner of the land or water or unless so conducted as to be imminently dangerous to persons or property lawfully on the land or water beneath.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 1; Code 1933, § 11-101.

Law reviews.

For note, “A Study of the Development and Current Status in Georgia of Inverse Condemnation Suits by a Landowner for Taking by Aerial Flights,” see 2 Ga. St. B.J. 232 (1965).

6-2-5.1.
Operation or physical control of aircraft while under the influence of alcohol or drugs; penalty.

A person shall not operate or be in actual physical control of an aircraft in this state:

Within eight hours after the consumption of any alcoholic beverage;

While under the influence of alcohol;

While using any drug that affects such person’s faculties in any way contrary to safety; or

While there is 0.04 percent or more by weight of alcohol in his blood.

Any person arrested for violation of this Code section shall, at the request of a law enforcement officer of the state or any political subdivision, be administered a test as provided by and subject to the restrictions of subsection (a) of Code Section 40-6-392.

A person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined in an amount not to exceed $2,000.00.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-2-5.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 276, § 1.

6-2-5.2.
Homicide by aircraft.

Any person who, without malice aforethought, causes the death of another person through the violation of Code Section 6-2-5.1 commits the offense of homicide by aircraft and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than two years nor more than 15 years.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-2-5.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1443, § 1.

6-2-6.
Rules for determination of liability for injury to or death of passengers.

The liability of the operator of an aircraft carrying passengers, for injury to or death of such passengers, shall be determined by the rules of law applicable to torts on land arising out of similar relationships.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 7; Code 1933, § 11-107.

Cross references.

Duties of carriers of passengers generally, §

46-9-132

.

6-2-7.
Rules for determination of liability of owners of aircraft for damages caused by collisions.

The liability of the owner of one aircraft to the owner of another aircraft or to pilots on either aircraft for damage caused by collision on land or in the air shall be determined by the rules of law applicable to torts on land.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 6; Code 1933, § 11-106.

6-2-8.
Proof of injury to persons or property on ground deemed prima-facie evidence of negligence.

Proof of injury inflicted to persons or property on the ground by the operation of any aircraft and contact therewith or by objects falling or thrown therefrom shall be prima-facie evidence of negligence on the part of the operator of such aircraft in reference to such injury.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 5; Code 1933, § 11-105.

6-2-9.
Requirements as to licensing of aircraft.

Since the public safety requires, and the advantages of uniform regulation make it desirable in the interest of aeronautical progress, that aircraft operating within the state should conform, with respect to design, construction, and airworthiness, to the standards prescribed by the federal government with respect to navigation of civil aircraft subject to its jurisdiction, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate or navigate any aircraft unless such aircraft has an appropriate effective license issued by the Federal Aviation Administration and is registered by the Federal Aviation Administration; provided, however, that this restriction shall not apply to military aircraft of the United States or possessions thereof, to public aircraft of any state or territory, or to aircraft licensed by a foreign country with which the United States has a reciprocal agreement covering the operation of such licensed aircraft.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 2; Code 1933, § 11-102.

6-2-10.
Requirements as to licensing of pilots.

Since the public safety requires, and the advantages of uniform regulation make it desirable in the interest of aeronautical progress, that a person engaging in navigating or operating aircraft in any form of navigation shall have the qualifications necessary for obtaining and holding a pilot’s license issued by the Federal Aviation Administration, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate or navigate any aircraft unless such person is the holder of an appropriate effective pilot’s license or permit issued by the Federal Aviation Administration; provided, however, that this restriction shall not apply to those persons operating military aircraft of the United States or possessions thereof, or operating public aircraft of any state or territory, or operating any aircraft licensed by a foreign country with which the United States has a reciprocal agreement covering the operation of such licensed aircraft.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 3; Code 1933, § 11-103.

6-2-11.
Possession and display of licenses.

The certificate of the license required for pilots shall be kept in the personal possession of the licensee when he is operating aircraft; the certificate of the license required for aircraft shall be kept in the aircraft at all times when the aircraft is being used; and either or both of the certificates must be presented for inspection upon the demand of any passenger, any peace officer, or any official, manager, or person in charge of any airport or landing field upon which the pilot or aircraft shall land.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 4; Code 1933, § 11-104.

6-2-12.
Penalty for violation of provisions of chapter.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1933, p. 99, § 10; Code 1933, § 11-9901.